incubator/apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
     <pardef n="ž/ena__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ena</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eny</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enu</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enou</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eny</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ien</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enám</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eny</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enách</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enami</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="ul/ica__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ica</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ici</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ice</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>icu</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ici</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>icou</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ice</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íc</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iciam</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ice</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iciach</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>icami</l>
          <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="dla/ň__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ň</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ň</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ňou</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ní</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niam</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niach</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ňami</l>
          <r>ň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="kos/ť__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ť</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ť</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ťou</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tí</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiam</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiach</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ťami</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="chlap/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>och</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>

    <e lm="žena"><i>ž</i><par n="ž/ena__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ulica"><i>ul</i><par n="ul/ica__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dlaň"><i>dla</i><par n="dla/ň__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kosť"><i>kos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chlap"><i>chlap</i><par n="chlap/__n"/></e>
